Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-202
Research and extension center west of 100th meridian; object.

The object of the research and extension center referred to in section 85-201 shall be to determine the adaptability of the arid and semiarid portions of Nebraska to agriculture, horticulture, and forest-tree growing, such as the producing of grain, grasses, root crops, and fruits of kinds commonly grown in the same latitude in other states, and the most economical methods of producing such crops without irrigation.

Laws 1903, c. 114, § 4, p. 591;

R.S.1913, § 7137;

C.S.1922, § 6787;

C.S.1929, § 85-203;

R.S.1943, § 85-202;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 75.